California statutes. Public Resources Code
(e) Decision-support tools for
 planners, decisionmakers, and others, including organizations that serve vulnerable communities,
 that allow for actionable application of assessment research findings. To the extent data is available, this shall include guidance regarding assessment of the financial and economic costs and benefits of adaptation decisions.

(f) Examples of best practices for planning for future climate conditions and approaches to building adaptation and resilience, while also meeting established greenhouse gas emission reduction goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   (SB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

71342.

(a) The Office of Planning and Research shall engage with regional and local governments, tribes, vulnerable communities, businesses, and members of the public, as necessary, in determining the scope of the assessment.

(b) All
 final assessment products shall be posted on or accessible through a state internet website in an accessible format.

(c) Upon completion of the assessment, the Office of Planning and Research shall make accessible to the Department of Finance for purposes of assessing liabilities in the state budget, and to regional and local governments, tribes, and vulnerable communities, the contents and application of the assessment, including the downscaled projections specified in subdivision (a) of
 Section
 71341 and the decision-support tools specified in subdivision (e) of Section 71341.

(d) Development of the assessment shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   (SB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

71343.

(a) The implementation of this part is contingent upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute for purposes of this part.

(b) (1) The Office of Planning and Research may
 receive and accept gifts, donations, contributions, or bequests of money from public, nonprofit, or philanthropic sources for purposes of this part.

(2) The expenditure of all moneys received for purposes of this part shall be subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   (SB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.5. Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program [71350. - 71361.]

71350.

For purposes of this part, “office” means the Office of Planning and Research.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71352.

The Legislature finds and declares:

(a) The state has been a leader in climate mitigation efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions. Now, and in the coming years, it is critical for California and the global community to continue and intensify those efforts in order to avoid the most
 severe impacts from a changing climate. However, because the global climate system changes slowly, impacts are ongoing and will inevitably worsen. In order to address the challenges posed by a changing climate, the state must invest in building resiliency and strengthening adaptation efforts at the state, regional, and local levels using the best-available science.

(b) A principle of the state’s adaptation strategy document, Safeguarding California, is to prioritize actions that not only reduce greenhouse gas emissions, but also help the state prepare for climate change impacts. Improved coordination, implementation, and integration of adaptation planning
 efforts and funding in the state’s climate policies can directly protect the state’s infrastructure, communities, environmental quality, public health, safety and security, natural resources, and economy from the unavoidable impacts of climate change for decades to come.

(c) In order to have a cohesive and comprehensive response to climate change impacts, the state must have integrated planning with coordinated strategies across state, regional, and local governments and agencies.

(d) The office is established as the comprehensive state planning agency that shall engage in the formulation, evaluation, and updating of long-range goals for factors that shape statewide development patterns and significantly influence the quality of the state’s environment, in addition to assisting state, regional, and local agencies in a variety of research and planning efforts, pursuant to Section 65040 of the Government Code. Therefore, the office is well-positioned to work with regional and local entities across the state,
 coordinating with state climate adaptation strategies.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature, therefore, that adaptation strategies to build resiliency to the risks and impacts from climate change be integrated in state policies, projects, and permitting
 processes, and that the office serve as a coordinating body for adaptation projects and goals across California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71354.

The Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program is hereby established to be administered by the office. No later than January 1, 2017, the Director of State Planning and Research shall establish the program to coordinate regional and local efforts with state climate adaptation strategies to adapt to the impacts of climate change with, to the extent feasible,
 an emphasis on climate equity considerations across sectors and regions and strategies that benefit both greenhouse gas emissions reductions and adaptation efforts, in order to facilitate the development of holistic, complimentary strategies for adapting to climate change impacts. In order to achieve these goals, the program shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Working with and coordinating local and regional efforts for climate adaptation and resilience, including, but not
 limited to, the following:

(1) Developing tools and guidance.

(2) Promoting and coordinating state agency support for local and regional efforts.

(3) Informing state-led programs, including state planning processes, grant programs, and guideline development, to better reflect the goals, efforts, and challenges faced by local and regional
 entities pursuing
 adaptation, preparedness, and resilience. This should occur through regular coordination between the office, the Climate Action Team, which was established by Executive Order S-3-05, the Strategic Growth Council, and other state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Office of Emergency Services, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the Natural Resources Agency, the Transportation Agency, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(b) Assisting the Office of Emergency Services and other relevant state agencies with coordinating regular reviews and updates, as needed, to the Adaptation Planning Guide, pursuant to Section 71356, and maintaining a copy of the guide, or an electronic link to a
 copy of the guide
 posted, at a minimum, on the state’s Climate Change Portal and the office’s Internet Web site.

(c) Coordinating and maintaining the state’s clearinghouse for climate adaptation information, pursuant to Section 71360.

(d) Conducting regular meetings with the advisory council established pursuant to Section 71358 in order to have technical support, as well as expertise and advice from regional and local experts working in climate adaptation throughout the research and planning processes, as described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71356.

(a) Within one year of an update to the Safeguarding California Plan, the Office of Emergency Services, in coordination with the Natural Resources Agency, the office,
 and relevant public and private entities, shall review and update, as necessary, the Adaptation Planning Guide to provide tools and guidance to regional and local governments and agencies in creating and implementing climate adaptation and community resiliency plans and projects. An Adaptation Planning Guide update shall be informed by the climate adaptation clearinghouse established pursuant to Section
 71360 and the scientific assessments and recommendations in the most recent update of the Safeguarding California Plan. An Adaptation Planning Guide update shall consider the nexus between climate adaptation, community resiliency, public safety, and security, provide information and planning support for assessing climate vulnerabilities across impact sectors and regions and developing
 adaptation strategies that can be tailored to meet local needs, and include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Guidance for coordinating adaptation planning activities among state and local governments and regional collaboratives.

(2) Adaptation planning guidance and strategies for natural hazards exacerbated by climate change.

(3) Guidance for conducting vulnerability assessments and identifying risk reduction strategies for communities.

(4) Identification of climate impact regions and descriptions of climate impacts to be considered for each region.

(5) Assistance with the interpretation of climate science as it relates to local and regional impacts.

(b) As part of updating the Adaptation Planning Guide, the Office of Emergency Services, in consultation with the office and, as needed, with the advisory council created pursuant to Section 71358,
 shall hold public meetings in the northern, southern, and central regions of the state to obtain input from the public and leaders in local and regional climate preparedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71358.

(a) An advisory council to the office is hereby established. The advisory council shall be comprised of members from a range of disciplines, in order to provide scientific and technical support, and from regional and local governments and entities. The advisory council shall support the office’s goals, as identified in this part, to facilitate coordination among state, regional, and local agency efforts to adapt to the impacts of climate change.

(b) Members of the advisory council shall
 have expertise in the intersection of climate change and areas that include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Public health.

(2) Environmental quality.

(3) Environmental justice.

(4) Agriculture.

(5) Transportation and housing.

(6) Energy.

(7) Natural resources and water.

(8) Planning.

(9) Recycling and waste
 management.

(10) Local or regional government.

(11) Tribal issues.

(12) Emergency services and public safety.

(c) The advisory council shall meet with the office as needed, but not less than three times a year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71360.

(a) (1) The office shall coordinate with appropriate entities, including state, regional, or local agencies, to establish a clearinghouse for climate adaptation information for use by state, regional, and local entities. 

(2) The clearinghouse shall be a centralized source of information that provides available climate data to guide decisionmakers at state, regional, and local levels when planning for and implementing climate adaptation projects to promote resiliency to climate change. The clearinghouse may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) A collection
 of the best-available resources that may include projections and models, vulnerability assessments, and downscaled data for climate change impacts throughout the state, when available, at statewide, regional, and local levels for both near-term and longer term timescales, including year 2050 and year 2100 projections. Climate change impacts may include, but are not limited to, impacts to public health, natural resources, environmental quality, and infrastructure.

(B) Tools that allow for the visualization or identification of regional and local impacts across the state and that integrate best-available data on vulnerable populations and infrastructure.

(C) A library of relevant white papers, case studies, research articles, and climate adaptation best practices that are searchable by
 relevance to region, locality, and sector.

(D) Information concerning funding opportunities for adaptation research, planning, and projects.

(E) Regionally prioritized best-practice adaptation projects that, as appropriate, integrate efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions across the state.

(b) The clearinghouse shall be regularly updated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 246)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

71361.

(a) On or before July 1, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the office and the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with relevant state agencies and to be integrated into the climate adaptation strategy developed pursuant to Section 71153, shall update the Extreme Heat Action Plan to promote comprehensive, coordinated, and effective state and local government action on extreme heat. Updates to the Extreme Heat Action Plan shall include all of the following:

(1) Review of relevant actions
 and grants that state agencies have undertaken to mitigate extreme heat and implement the Extreme Heat Action Plan, including, but not limited to, an in-depth review of select programs and actions, including, but not limited to, the ICARP Extreme Heat and Community Resilience Grant Program, as described in Item 0650-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022, projects that use cool and reflective surfaces, and efforts to address extreme heat on California’s school campuses.

(2) A description of the resources, budget allocations, expenditures, and staff dedicated to addressing extreme heat.

(3) A review of state programs that address extreme heat to identify potential gaps or unmet needs in the state’s approach and that includes recommendations on ways to improve policies, programs, and interagency coordination.

 (4) Recommendations on additional measures to protect vulnerable populations, such as pupils and students, from the impacts of extreme heat, including, but not limited to, community cooling strategies.

(b) The Extreme Heat Action Plan and subsequent updates shall be posted on the office’s and the Natural Resources Agency’s
 internet websites and, notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, shall be provided to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature.

(c) For purposes of this section, “Extreme Heat Action Plan” means the April 2022 plan entitled “Protecting Californians From Extreme Heat: A State Action Plan to Build Community Resilience.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 387, Sec. 2.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.7. Forest and Watershed Restoration [71365. - 71365.]

71365.

(a) (1) To advance the goals of Item 0540-101-3228 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2018, the Natural Resources Agency and the California Environmental Protection Agency may jointly develop and submit to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a plan for forest and watershed restoration investments for the drainages that supply the Oroville, Shasta, and Trinity Reservoirs.

(2) The spatially explicit plan authorized under paragraph (1) is intended to establish a comprehensive understanding of restoration needs and prioritize investment opportunities that will improve watershed function and resilience, water quality and supply reliability, forest carbon stores, wildlife habitat, and
 climate adaptation.

(b) Those agencies may jointly develop and propose to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature a pilot project for the coordinated, multiagency permitting of watershed restoration activities in the watersheds described in subdivision (a), as outlined in subdivision (c) of Section 108.5 of the Water Code.

(c) The Headwaters Restoration Account is hereby established in the General Fund. Funds may be deposited into the account and used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 638, Sec. 5.   (AB 2551)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. URBAN HEAT ISLAND EFFECT [71400. - 71400.]

71400.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all of the following shall occur:

(1) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall work with its partners on the Climate Action Team to develop heat reduction strategies that include urban forestry, cool roofs, and sustainable or cool pavements.

(2) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a definition for the urban heat island effect. The definition shall include the extent and severity of an urban heat island effect index for California cities such that the cities can have a quantifiable goal for heat reduction.

(3) In support of this effort, the Department of Transportation shall work with the California Environmental Protection Agency and other stakeholders on sustainable or cool pavement technologies and research.

(b) Upon completion of a definition for an urban heat island effect index, the Department of Transportation shall develop a standard specification for sustainable or cool pavements that can be used to reduce the urban heat island effect index.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 667, Sec. 3.   (AB 296)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. Extreme Heat [71410. - 71410.]

71410.

(a) For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(2) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(3) “Extreme heat” means increasing temperatures or other meteorological conditions that could result in any of the following:

(A) Extreme heat wave.

(B) Heat health event.

(C) Heat watch, warning, or advisory from the National Weather
 Service, the Office of Emergency Services, or a county health officer.

(D) A proclamation of a state of emergency by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.

(4) “ICARP” means the Integrated Climate Adaptation and Resiliency Program, established pursuant to Section 71354, at the Office of Planning and Research.

(5) “Vulnerable community” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 71340.

(b) On or before January 1, 2025, the
 agency, in coordination with the ICARP, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Insurance, shall develop a statewide extreme heat ranking system to be based upon, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Available meteorological data from government and academic sources, including maximum temperature, minimum temperature, and duration of extreme heat events.

(2) Information and data on health impacts of heat established through best available science or data from past heat and extreme heat events, including available mortality and morbidity information.

(3) Measures of extreme heat severity, including the severity of the outcome of extreme heat on human health.

(4) Locally relevant information, such as urban heat island effects, or cooling effects from urban tree canopies or other cooling measures.

(5) Comments and suggestions obtained from public input received at a minimum of one public workshop, as appropriate.

(c) The statewide extreme heat ranking system shall include all of the following:

(1) Recommendations on thresholds or triggers for public policies that reduce the risk of extreme heat impacts and prioritize reducing the impacts of extreme heat to human health.

(2) Recommendations for metrics to measure the short-term and long-term impacts of extreme heat on human health.

(3) A consideration of the information reported by the Department of Insurance, including the results of the study prepared pursuant to subdivision (f).

(d) The statewide extreme heat ranking system shall be adaptable for use at locally relevant scales. 

(e) After the statewide extreme heat ranking system is finalized, the ICARP shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop, in consultation with the Office of Emergency
 Services, the State Department of Public Health, the Department of Insurance, and other state agencies, and with input from local governments, local health departments, tribal organizations, labor organizations, environmental organizations, and community groups from disadvantaged and vulnerable communities, a public communication plan for the statewide extreme heat ranking system with a focus on strategies that target communications to populations that are most at risk of public health and emergency impacts from extreme heat events, including, but not limited to, the most vulnerable populations. The communication plan shall include both of the following:

(A) Outreach plans for reaching diverse and vulnerable populations.

(B) Recommendations for targeted
 communications by local governments that include the use of culturally appropriate materials translated into multiple languages based on the common languages spoken in the locality.

(2) Recommend partnerships with local health departments and
 local and tribal governments, and develop statewide guidance for local and tribal governments in the preparation and planning for extreme heat events.

(3) Review the extreme heat ranking system and, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health, recommend to local governments specific and locally relevant heat adaptation, preparedness, and resilience measures that could be linked to the statewide extreme heat ranking system and identify how the statewide extreme heat ranking system aligns with additional extreme heat adaptation policies pursuant to Section 71354.

(f) The Department of Insurance shall develop a study that does all of the following:

(1) Identifies past extreme heat events with differing duration, maximum temperature, humidity, and measurable health impacts.

(2) Examines the past extreme heat events identified pursuant to paragraph (1) to determine uninsured and insured economic costs, the insurance gaps among racial and socioeconomic groups that face disproportionate impacts from extreme heat, and the effectiveness of insurance coverages, including among different types of insurance policies and their costs and payouts, to prevent losses or help communities plan public health initiatives related to combating the effects of extreme heat.

(3) Identifies insurance options that will support the specific adaptation, preparedness, and resilience
 measures developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(4) Draws information from local and regional heat mitigation plans and initiatives.

(5) Incorporates local input to identify local heat risks that are or have historically been uninsured and determine the barriers encountered by local governments that are trying to use insurance or other financing tools, including, but not limited to, heat-index-triggered parametric insurance, catastrophe bonds, and
 resilience bonds, to fund or support heat risk mitigation or adaptation strategies.

(6) Includes recommendations for overcoming the barriers identified pursuant to paragraph (5) and details key elements of potential model local heat risk transfer mechanisms.

(g) On or before July 1, 2024, the Department of Insurance shall transmit the results of the study prepared pursuant to subdivision (f) to the agency, the ICARP, and the legislative policy committees with jurisdiction over natural resources, environmental quality, insurance, and the budget, and shall post the study on its internet website. 

(h) The requirement for submitting a study imposed under subdivision (g) is inoperative on
 January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(i) The agency, in coordination with the ICARP, the State Department of Public Health, and the Department of Insurance, shall periodically review and update the extreme heat ranking system, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 264, Sec. 2.   (AB 2238)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. Water-Energy Nexus Registry [71420. - 71424.]

71420.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Agency” means the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(b) “The Climate Registry” means the nonprofit organization that is a successor to the California Climate Action Registry (former Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 42800) of Part 4 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, as added by Section 1 of Chapter 1018 of the Statutes of 2000).

(c) “Registry” means the water-energy nexus registry developed pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   (SB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71422.

(a) (1) The agency shall oversee the development of a registry for greenhouse gas emissions that result from the water-energy nexus using the best-available data.

(2) Participation in the registry shall be voluntary and open to any entity conducting business in the state. A participating entity may register its emissions, including emissions generated outside of the state, on an entitywide basis and may utilize the services of the registry.

(b) The agency may enter into a contract with a qualified nonprofit organization to do all of the following:

(1) Develop, in consultation with the agency and other relevant state agencies, the registry through a public stakeholder process, as determined by the agency. In developing the registry, the chosen qualified nonprofit organization shall consider greenhouse gas emissions accounting methodologies developed as part of programs authorized pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) Help participating entities in the state to establish emissions baselines.

(3) Encourage voluntary actions to increase water and energy efficiency measures to reduce the greenhouse gas intensity of the state’s water system.

(4) Enable participating entities to record voluntary entitywide greenhouse gas emissions reductions in a consistent format that is supported by third-party verification.

(5) Recognize, publicize, and promote participating entities making voluntary reductions of greenhouse gas emissions.

(6) Recruit broad participation in the registry from all economic sectors and regions of the state.

(7) Facilitate streamlined data reporting for relevant entities already reporting to the Climate Registry as part of its voluntary corporate greenhouse gas emissions reporting program.

(c) (1) The contract authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be limited to a term of three years.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the term of the contract may be extended for one year upon the agreement of both parties to the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   (SB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

71424.

Pursuant to Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code, entities participating in the registry may qualify for financing opportunities that provide incentives to reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   (SB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. BIODIVERSITY [71450. - 71453.]

71450.

(a) For the purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(1) “30x30 goal” means the goal to conserve 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030 established in subdivision (b) and by Executive Order No. N-82-20.

(2) “Pathways to 30x30 Report” means the report entitled “Pathways to 30x30 California: Accelerating Conservation of California’s Nature” that was issued by the Natural Resources Agency on April 22, 2022.

(b) It is the goal of the state to conserve at least 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   (SB 337)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

71451.

In implementing the 10 pathways and specific near-term priority actions described in the Pathways to 30x30 Report to achieve the 30x30 goal, the Natural Resources Agency shall prioritize the following actions:

(a) Creating and facilitating the 30x30 Partnership, which includes the Ocean Protection Council, 30x30 Coordinating Committee, California Biodiversity Council, and California Biodiversity Network.

(b) Conducting public outreach to engage historically marginalized communities in the planning and implementation of the 30x30 goal.

(c) Identifying and promoting regional 30x30 goal efforts, including efforts that enhance equitable public access to
 nature.

(d) Supporting tribal engagement and leadership in implementing the 30x30 goal.

(e) Enhancing coordination between state, local, and federal agencies and departments to ensure that relevant state programs and actions are complementary to, and assist achieving, the 30x30 goal.

(f) Partnering with federal agencies to leverage strategic funding and resources in achieving the 30x30 goal.

(g) Promoting and supporting partnering state agencies and departments that acquire and steward state land, including, but not limited to, the Department of Parks and Recreation, in the acquisition of new state land and responsible stewardship of state land, as feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

71452.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall prepare and submit, on or before March 31, 2024, and annually thereafter, a report to the Legislature on the progress made in the prior calendar year toward achieving the 30x30 goal. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) The number of acres conserved in the prior calendar year and the number of acres remaining that need to be conserved to meet the 30x30 goal, including information on how that goal is conserving California’s imperiled biodiversity.

(2) A summary of the progress made in the prior calendar year to advance toward the 30x30 goal and
 the near-term priority actions identified in the Pathways to 30x30 Report.

(3) How and where state funding that was expended in the prior calendar year was used in furtherance of the 30x30 goal, including the amount of funding expended by each partnering state agency and department for land and water conservation, science and research, public outreach and engagement, and managing, monitoring, and restoring conserved lands and water.

(4) The progress made by the 30x30 Partnership in the prior calendar year, including by the 30x30 Coordinating Committee, California Biodiversity Council, and California Biodiversity Network.

(5) The status of, and progress made by, CA Nature, which is the suite of interactive mapping and visualization tools developed pursuant to the 30x30 goal, and other scientific research or tools
 developed in the prior calendar year to support the 30x30 goal.

(6) The coordination between local, state, and federal agencies in support of the 30x30 goal.

(7) The progress made in the prior calendar year to address equity as part of the 30x30 goal, including state funding invested in community engagement, planning, acquisition and restoration, equitable outdoor access, and expenditures for efforts by tribes or community-based groups.

(8) Identified barriers to implementing the 30x30 goal and recommended actions taken or needed to address those barriers.

(9) Interim benchmarks for the next calendar year to help meet the 30x30 goal and specific actions to implement the 30x30 goal.

(b) A
 report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

71453.

(a) The Natural Resources Agency shall develop strategies to reduce barriers and increase support for stewardship of conserved lands in order to further the findings from the Pathways to 30x30 Report, which provided that designating an area as conserved is only the beginning of effective conservation and that protected areas require ongoing stewardship and monitoring.

(b) The Natural Resources Agency shall collaborate with stakeholders, California Native American tribes, and relevant state agencies to prepare a section on
 stewardship as part of the 2027 annual report required pursuant to Section 71452 that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) An estimate of backlogged, critical, recurring, and future stewardship needs throughout the state with associated costs. The Natural Resources Agency may use datasets, that are in existence on or before March 31, 2027, from federal, state, and local governments,
 California Native American tribes, private entities, and tribal landowners and managers to complete this estimate.

(2) Case studies of effective stewardship.

(3) A review of stewardship best practices for conserved lands that includes, but is not limited to, new technology and innovative practices that improve outcomes and cost-effectiveness.

(4) A valuation of the benefits of stewardship on biodiversity and ecosystem services.

(5) Identification of the ecological workforce needs for stewardship and opportunities to support workforce training.

(6) A review of the
 cobenefits of stewardship that includes, but is not limited to, recreation and public access, the provision of habitat and resources for wildlife, carbon sequestration, water and air purification, and climate regulation.

(7) Recommendations to increase and improve stewardship of 30x30 lands, including innovative ways to reduce barriers and increase federal, state, and local support for stewardship.

(8) Recommendations to increase ancestral land return.

(9) Recommendations to increase consultation and partnership with California Native American tribes and tribal cultural
 practitioners throughout the state, including, but not limited to, support for tribal stewardship activities, traditional ecological knowledge, and cultural practices.

(c) The update required pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be posted on the Natural Resources Agency’s internet website.

(d) For purposes of this section, “stewardship” includes, but is not limited to, science-based management, adaptive management, traditional ecological knowledge, and best land management practices across all land types.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 385, Sec. 1.   (AB 900)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. Carbon Dioxide Capture, Removal, or Sequestration Projects [71460. - 71465.]

71460.

For purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project” means a carbon dioxide capture project, a carbon dioxide removal project, or a sequestration project that seeks to provide for the long-term isolation or utilization of the carbon dioxide from the atmosphere through storage in a geologic formation.

(b) “Carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator” means a person owning or operating a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project.

(c) “Geologic storage complex” means one or more geologic storage reservoirs and any associated
 facilities or infrastructure necessary to convey, inject, or store carbon dioxide streams at the site of a geologic storage reservoir.

(d) “Geologic storage reservoir” means a portion of a sedimentary geologic stratum or formation containing pore spaces, including depleted oil and gas reservoirs and saline formations, that is suitable for injection and permanent storage of carbon dioxide in the state.

(e) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(f) “State board” means the State Air Resources Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

71461.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the secretary, in consultation with the state board, shall publish a framework for governing agreements regarding two or more tracts of land overlying the same geologic storage reservoir or reservoirs for purposes of managing, developing, and operating a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project. The framework shall include recommended requirements for the submission of these agreements to, and the review, approval, or denial of these agreements by, an authorized state agency, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of the appropriate state agency for submission, review, and approval or denial of the agreements, including any legal authorization or
 delegation necessary.

(2) A requirement that agreement proponents own title to at least an undivided three-fourths of the total interests subject to the proposed agreement.

(3) Standards to determine fair and reasonable compensation for owners of surface, mineral, and subsurface rights whose use of their property will be infringed upon by the geologic storage reservoir.

(4) A requirement to make a good faith offer of compensation by project proponents to the owners of surface, mineral, and subsurface rights before submission of an agreement.

(5) Standards for the provision of surface site access, to the extent reasonably necessary for postinjection monitoring.

(6) Standards for the
 allocation of liability related to the geologic storage reservoir, and associated injection wells, including, but not limited to, standards regarding the liability of a surface landowner who has sold or leased all interests in the geologic storage reservoir to a carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operator.

(7) Standards for imposing sufficient financial responsibility requirements on carbon dioxide capture, removal, or sequestration project operators, including, but not limited to, the short-term costs of corrective actions, the cost of any liability associated with damage to drinking water supplies or seismic activity triggered by the geologic storage reservoir or damage to public and environmental health and safety, and long-term costs associated with well plugging and abandonment, ongoing site care and monitoring, and site closure of the geologic storage reservoir.

(8) Standards for allocating royalty payments associated with the leasing of a geologic storage reservoir.

(9) Any other requirements necessary to comply with state or federal legal or constitutional standards.
